Utah statutes.
53-10-305 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Duties of bureau chief.
The bureau chief, with the consent of the commissioner, shall do the
following:
(1)  conduct in conjunction with the state boards of education and higher
education in state schools, colleges, and universities, an educational program
concerning alcoholic products, and work in conjunction with civic
organizations, churches, local units of government, and other organizations in
the prevention of alcoholic product and drug violations;
(2)  coordinate law enforcement programs throughout the state and accumulate
and disseminate information related to the prevention, detection, and control
of violations of this chapter and Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act,
as it relates to storage or consumption of alcoholic beverages on premises
maintained by a club licensee, or a person required to be licensed as a club
licensee, as defined in Section 32A-1-105;
(3)  make inspections and investigations as required by the commission and the
Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control;
(4)  perform other acts as may be necessary or appropriate concerning control
of the use of alcoholic beverages and products and drugs; and
(5)  make reports and recommendations to the Legislature, the governor, the
commissioner, the commission, and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control
as may be required or requested.
